Hawaii statutes.
[§225P-1] Purpose. The purpose
of this chapter is to address the effects of climate change to protect the
State's economy, environment, health, and way of life. [L 2014, c 83, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next